Arkansas, session 2025, HB1302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-15-302(a)(B)(i), concerning testing of
newborn infants within the Universal Newborn Screening Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(B)(i) All newborn infants shall be tested for duchenne
muscular dystrophy and core medical conditions as listed in the recommended
uniform screening panel recommended by the United States Secretary of Health
and Human Services, in order to provide appropriate newborn screening
guidelines to protect the health and welfare of newborns.









*JMB043*
01/29/2025 1:07:13 PM JMB043